District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-129.05

Officers and employees.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 15
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-226, § 102, 51 DCR 10539
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 201, 54 DCR 10993
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 223(b), 56 DCR 1117
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884
D.C. Law 17-108, in subsec. (a), inserted “provided, that the Executive Director of the Commission shall be a District resident and shall remain a District resident for the duration of his or her employment by the Commission. Failure to maintain District residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position”; added subsec. (a-1); and, in subsec. (b), inserted “, a listing of the names of all new employees, their pay schedules, titles, and place of residence”.
D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (a), designated pars. (1) and (2), substituted a period for “; provided that” at the end of par. (1); and, in subsec. (b), inserted “and” preceding “a listing”.